Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2764
Income tax; fiduciary; notice of qualification.

Every receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for benefit of creditors, or other like fiduciary, shall give notice of his qualification as such to the Tax Commissioner, as may be required by regulation.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 64, p. 1599.